District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.23

Purchase card reporting requirement.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 323
as added Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-326, § 2, 52 DCR 1439
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 131, 52 DCR 10637
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185